Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 4

Trafficking in Children

37-5-401. Consent required for importation of child.

No person, agency, association, institution or corporation shall bring or send into this state any child for the purpose of giving the child's custody to some person, institution, corporation or agency in the state, or procuring its adoption by some person in the state without first obtaining the written consent of the department of human services.

Williams, § 4727.1; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-505,14-9-201; T.C.A., §71-3-401; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 157.

Law Reviews.

Justice for Victims of Human Trafficking and Forced Labor: Why Current Theories of Corporate Liability Do Not Work, 43 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1047 (2013).

Prosecuting Demand as a Crime of Human Trafficking: The Eighth Circuit Decision in United States v. Jungers, 43 U. Mem. L. Rev. 917 (2013).

Using Commercial Driver Licensing Authority to Combat Human Trafficking Related Crimes on America's Highways, 43 U. Mem. L. Rev. 969 (2013).

37-5-402. Placement of imported child.

The person, agency or corporation with whom a child is placed for either of the purposes set out in § 37-5-401 shall be responsible for the child's proper care and training.

The department of human services, through its agents, shall permit the placing of such child only with a licensed child-caring or child-placing agency or maternity home or in a family home that has been studied and approved by the department's own agent.

Acts 1951, ch. 116, § 1 (Williams, § 4737.1); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1506,14-9-202; T.C.A., §71-3-402; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 157.

Cross-References. Licensing of agencies, §§71-3-501 —71-3-513.

Collateral References.

Right in child custody proceedings to cross-examine investigating officer whose report is used by court in its decision. 59 A.L.R.3d 1337.

37-5-403. Bond on importation of child.

The department may in its discretion require of a person, agency, association, institution or corporation that brings or sends a child into the state, with the written consent of the department, as provided in § 37-5-401, a continuing bond in a sum not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), with such condition as may be prescribed and such sureties as may be approved by the department.

Such bond shall be made in favor of, and filed with, the department, with the premium prepaid by the person, agency, association, institution or corporation desiring to place such child in the state.

Acts 1951, ch. 116, § 1 (Williams § 4737.1); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1507,14-9-203; T.C.A., §71-3-403; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 157.

37-5-404. Consent to take child out of state.

No child shall be taken or sent out of the state for the purpose of placing the child in a foster home or in a child-caring institution without first obtaining the written consent of the department of human services.

All out-of-state placements shall be cleared with the proper authorities of the receiving state by the department.

The foster home or child-caring institution in which the child is placed shall report to the department at such times and through such agency and in such form as the department may direct as to the location and well-being of such child.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1951, ch. 116, § 1 (Williams § 4737.1); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1508,14-9-204; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; T.C.A., §71-3-404; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 157.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

37-5-405. Penalty for violations.

Every person acting for that person or for any agency who violates any of the provisions of this part, or any agency or corporation that, through its agents, violates any of the provisions of this part, or any person or agency that makes any false statements to the department of human services regarding the placement of such child, as herein set out, commits a Class A misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200), or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or by both fine and imprisonment.

Acts 1951, ch. 116, § 1 (Williams § 4737.1); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 14-1509, Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; T.C.A., §14-9-205; T.C.A., §71-3-405; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 157.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor in this section has been designated as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of §40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also §39-11-114.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

37-5-406. Exemption of relatives of child.

None of the provisions of this part shall apply when a child is brought into, or sent into, or taken out of, or sent out of the state, by a parent, stepparent, grandparent or other natural or legal guardian of the child.

Acts 1951, ch. 116, § 1 (Williams § 4737.1); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1510,14-9-206; T.C.A., §71-3-406; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 157.